Indiana, session 2026, SB13.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-19-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.259-2013,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) and as
otherwise provided in this chapter, this article does not apply to the
following with respect to equipment on vehicles:
(1) Implements of agriculture designed to be operated primarily
in a farm field or on farm premises.
(2) Road machinery.
(3) Road rollers.
(4) Farm tractors.
(5) Vehicle chassis that:
(A) are a part of a vehicle manufacturer's work in process; and
(B) are:
(i) driven under this subdivision only for a distance of less
than one (1) mile; or
(ii) towed under this subdivision only for a distance of
less than forty (40) miles on a highway that is not an
interstate highway.
(6) Golf carts and off-road vehicles when operated in accordance
with an ordinance adopted under IC 9-21-1-3(a)(14) or
IC 9-21-1-3.3(a).
(b) A farm type dry or liquid fertilizer tank trailer or spreader that
SEA 13

2
is drawn or towed on a highway by a motor vehicle other than a farm
tractor at a speed greater than thirty (30) miles per hour is considered
a trailer for equipment requirement purposes and all equipment
requirements concerning trailers apply.
SEA 13

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 13